Ohio, session 136, HB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5167.052 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5167.052. A medicaid managed care organization, the organization's subcontractors, or a third-party administrator shall provide a payment rate for durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies that equals one hundred per cent of the payment rate for durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies under the fee-for-service component of medicaid.